New Jersey, session 221, S3464.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: "Advanced conductor" means an overhead electricity conductor that has a direct current electrical resistance at least 10 percent lower than existing conductors of a similar diameter on the transmission and distribution system, based on established direct current resistance at standard pressure and a temperature of 20 degrees Celsius. "Advanced reconductoring" means the replacement of conventional overhead electricity conductors with advanced conductors. "Board" means the Board of Public Utilities. "Electric public utility" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Transmission and distribution system" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). b.  Each electric public utility shall, wherever practicable, upgrade its portion of the transmission and distribution system using advanced reconductoring, both in the course of routine maintenance to the system, and through standalone primary wire replacement projects. c.  No later than one year after the effective date of this act, each electric public utility shall conduct an assessment of its portion of the transmission and distribution system in order to determine the most cost effective and beneficial locations to be upgraded through advanced reconductoring.  No later than three months after the electric public utility completes the assessment, it shall make a filing with the board outlining the locations it proposes to upgrade. d.  An electric public utility may petition the board to include in the utility's rate base the reasonable costs of advanced reconductoring projects it undertakes pursuant to this section. e.  The board may develop criteria for what constitutes reasonable costs for advanced reconductoring projects.  In establishing the criteria, the board may consider decreased electrical losses and any other relevant consumer, environmental, and system benefits provided by advanced conductors. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.